Utah statutes.
63K-4-401.   Orders, rules, and regulations having force of law -- Filing
requirements -- Suspension of state agency rules -- Suspension of enforcement
of certain statutes during a state of emergency.
(1)  All orders, rules, and regulations promulgated by the governor, a
political subdivision, or other agency authorized by this act to make orders,
rules, and regulations, not in conflict with existing laws except as
specifically provided herein, shall have the full force and effect of law
during the state of emergency, when a copy of the order, rule, or regulation
is filed with:
(a)  the Division of Administrative Rules, if issued by the governor or a
state agency; or
(b)  the office of the clerk of the political subdivision, if issued by the
chief executive officer of a political subdivision of the state or agency of
the state.
(2)  The governor may suspend the provisions of any order, rule, or regulation
of any state agency, if the strict compliance with the provisions of the
order, rule, or regulation would substantially prevent, hinder, or delay
necessary action in coping with the emergency or disaster.
(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b) and subject to Subsections
(3)(c) and (d), the governor may by executive order suspend the enforcement of
a statute if:
(i)  the governor declares a state of emergency in accordance with Section
63K-4-203;
(ii)  the governor determines that suspending the enforcement of the statute
is:
(A)  directly related to the state of emergency described in Subsection
(3)(a)(i); and
(B)  necessary to address the state of emergency described in Subsection
(3)(a)(i);
(iii)  the executive order:
(A)  describes how the suspension of the enforcement of the statute is:
(I)  directly related to the state of emergency described in Subsection
(3)(a)(i); and
(II)  necessary to address the state of emergency described in Subsection
(3)(a)(i); and
(B)  provides the citation of the statute that is the subject of suspended
enforcement;
(iv)  the governor acts in good faith;
(v)  the governor provides written notice of the suspension of the enforcement
of the statute to the speaker of the House of Representatives and the
president of the Senate no later than 24 hours after suspending the
enforcement of the statute; and
(vi)  the governor makes the report required by Section 63K-4-406.
(b) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b)(ii), the governor may not
suspend the enforcement of a criminal penalty created in statute.
(ii)  The governor may suspend the enforcement of a misdemeanor or infraction
if:
(A)  the misdemeanor or infraction relates to food, health, or transportation;
and
(B)  the requirements of Subsection (3)(a) are met.
(c)  A suspension described in this Subsection (3) terminates no later than
the date the governor terminates the state of emergency in accordance with
Section 63K-4-203 to which the suspension relates.
(d)  The governor:
(i)  shall provide the notice required by Subsection (3)(a)(v) using the best
available method under the circumstances as determined by the governor; and
(ii)  may provide the notice required by Subsection (3)(a)(v) in electronic
format.
